Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-577
Class I, II, III, or IV school district; secretary; books, records, and reports; duty to preserve.

The secretary of a Class I, II, III, or IV school district shall (1) record all proceedings of the district in a book furnished by the district to be kept for that purpose, (2) preserve copies of all reports, and (3) safely preserve and keep all books and papers belonging to the office.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision IV, § 10, p. 348;

R.S.1913, § 6772;

C.S.1922, § 6313;

C.S.1929, § 79-410;

R.S.1943, § 79-410;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 96, p. 724;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-457;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 330;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 78;

Laws 2018, LB377, § 46;

Laws 2024, LB1329, § 53.
July 19, 2024
Secretary is custodian of records. George v. School Dist. No. 24 of Red Willow County, 157 Neb. 791, 61 N.W.2d 401 (1953).

Record is best evidence of what district has done. Burlington & M. R.R. Co. v. Lancaster County, 4 Neb. 293 (1876).